Georgia, session 2025_26, HB426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 10 of Title 15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to magistrate
courts, is amended in Code Section 15-10-20, relating to number, selection, term, filling
vacancies, chief magistrate, and bonds, by revising subsection (c) as follows:
"(c) Unless otherwise provided by local law, all magistrates taking office on or after
January 1, 1985, shall be selected as provided in this subsection. The chief magistrate shall
be elected by the voters of the county at the general election next preceding the expiration
of the term of the incumbent chief magistrate, in a partisan nonpartisan election in the same
H. B. 426
- 1 -

LC 47 3367/AP
manner as county judicial officers are elected, for a term beginning on the first day of
January following his or her election. As of July 1, 2025, no local Act providing for
partisan election of a chief magistrate or other magistrate shall be enacted or enforceable.
His or her successors shall likewise be elected quadrennially thereafter for terms beginning
on the first day of January following their election. Magistrates other than the chief
magistrate shall be appointed by the chief magistrate with the consent of the judges of
superior court. The term of a magistrate so appointed shall run concurrently with the term
of the chief magistrate by whom he or she was appointed."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to elections and
primaries generally, is amended by revising Code Section 21-2-138, relating to nonpartisan
elections for judicial offices, as follows:
"21-2-138.
The names of all candidates who have qualified with the Secretary of State for the office
of judge of a superior court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, or Justice of the Supreme Court
of this state and the names of all candidates who have qualified with the election
superintendent for the office of judge of a state court, office of judge of a probate court,
office of chief magistrate, or office of magistrate, when nonpartisan elections have been
authorized by law for such county judicial office, shall be placed on the ballot in a
nonpartisan election to be held and conducted jointly with the general primary in each
even-numbered year. No candidates for any such office shall be nominated by a political
party or by a petition as a candidate of a political body or as an independent candidate.
Candidates for any such office shall have their names placed on the nonpartisan portion of
each ballot by complying with the requirements prescribed in Code Section 21-2-132
specifically related to such nonpartisan candidates and by paying the requisite qualifying
fees as prescribed in Code Section 21-2-131. Candidates shall be listed on the official
H. B. 426
- 2 -

LC 47 3367/AP
ballot in a nonpartisan election as provided in Code Sections 21-2-284.1 and 21-2-285.1,
respectively. Except as otherwise specified in this chapter, the procedures to be employed
in conducting the nonpartisan election of judges of probate courts, chief magistrates,
magistrates, judges of state courts, judges of superior courts, Judges of the Court of
Appeals, and Justices of the Supreme Court shall conform as nearly as practicable to the
procedures governing general elections; and such general election procedures as are
necessary to complete this nonpartisan election process shall be adopted in a manner
consistent with such nonpartisan elections."
SECTION 3.
Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 21-2-139, relating to nonpartisan elections
authorized and conduct, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, the General
Assembly may provide by local Act for the election in nonpartisan elections of candidates
to fill county judicial offices of judges of probate courts, offices of local boards of
education, and offices of consolidated governments which are filled by the vote of the
electors of said county or political subdivision. Except as otherwise provided in this Code
section, the procedures to be employed in such nonpartisan elections shall conform as
nearly as practicable to the procedures governing nonpartisan elections as provided in this
chapter. Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, the election procedures
established by any existing local law which provides for the nonpartisan election of
candidates to fill county offices shall conform to the general procedures governing
nonpartisan elections as provided in this chapter, and such nonpartisan elections shall be
conducted in accordance with the applicable provisions of this chapter, notwithstanding the
provisions of any existing local law. For those offices for which the General Assembly,
pursuant to this Code section, provided by local Act for election in nonpartisan primaries
and elections, such offices shall no longer require nonpartisan primaries. Such officers
H. B. 426
- 3 -

LC 47 3367/AP
shall be elected in nonpartisan elections held and conducted in conjunction with the general
primary in even-numbered years in accordance with this chapter without a prior
nonpartisan primary. This Code section shall apply to all nonpartisan elections for
members of consolidated governments. All nonpartisan elections for members of
consolidated governments shall be governed by the provisions of this Code section and
shall be considered county elections and not municipal elections for the purposes of this
Code section. Nonpartisan elections for municipal offices shall be conducted on the dates
provided in the municipal charter."
SECTION 4.
Said chapter is further amended in said Code section as effective on January 1, 2027, by
revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, the General
Assembly may provide by local Act for the election in nonpartisan elections of candidates
to fill offices of judges of probate courts, offices of local boards of education, and offices
of consolidated governments which are filled by the vote of the electors of said county or
political subdivision. Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, the procedures
to be employed in such nonpartisan elections shall conform as nearly as practicable to the
procedures governing nonpartisan elections as provided in this chapter. Except as
otherwise provided in this Code section, the election procedures established by any existing
local law which provides for the nonpartisan election of candidates to fill county offices
shall conform to the general procedures governing nonpartisan elections as provided in this
chapter, and such nonpartisan elections shall be conducted in accordance with the
applicable provisions of this chapter, notwithstanding the provisions of any existing local
law. For those offices for which the General Assembly, pursuant to this Code section,
provided by local Act for election in nonpartisan primaries and elections, such offices shall
no longer require nonpartisan primaries. Such officers shall be elected in nonpartisan
H. B. 426
- 4 -

LC 47 3367/AP
elections held and conducted in conjunction with the general primary in even-numbered
years in accordance with this chapter without a prior nonpartisan primary. This Code
section shall apply to all nonpartisan elections for members of consolidated governments.
All nonpartisan elections for members of consolidated governments shall be governed by
the provisions of this Code section and shall be considered county elections and not
100 municipal elections for the purposes of this Code section. Nonpartisan elections for
101 municipal offices shall be conducted on the dates provided in the municipal charter."
102 SECTION 5.
103 (a) Except as provided for in subsection (b) of this section, this Act shall become effective
104 on July 1, 2025.
105 (b) Section 4 of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027, following the ratification
106 of an amendment to the Constitution of Georgia providing that all judges of the probate court
107 shall be elected in nonpartisan elections; provided, however, that to the extent this Act
108 conflicts with law in effect at the time of ratification, this Act and such amendment shall
109 control, and to the extent such law is not in conflict, the law in effect at the time of
110 ratification shall control and shall remain in full force and effect. If such amendment is not
111 so ratified, then this Act shall stand automatically repealed.
112 SECTION 6.
113 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 426
- 5 -